Utah statutes.
41-1a-221.   Registration of vehicles of political subdivisions or state --
Renewal of registration -- Expiration of registration -- Certification of
information -- Failure to comply.
(1) (a)  An entity referred to in Subsection 41-1a-407(1) shall register by
June 30 of each year each vehicle that it owns, operates, or leases.
(b)  This section does not apply to unmarked vehicles referred to in Section
41-1a-407, which shall be registered by the expiration date on the
registration card.
(2) (a)  The entity shall apply to the division to renew registration pursuant
to Section 41-1a-217.
(b)  The division shall renew registration pursuant to Section 41-1a-216.
(3)  A registration card and license plate issued to an entity under this
section are in full force and effect until:
(a)  the registration expires;
(b)  the vehicle is no longer owned or operated by that entity; or
(c)  the division takes action as provided in Subsection (6).
(4) (a)  If the owner of a vehicle subject to the provisions of this section
transfers or assigns title or interest in the vehicle, the registration of
that vehicle expires.
(b)  The transferor shall remove the license plates and within 20 days from
the date of transfer forward them to the division to be destroyed.
(5)  Each entity shall:
(a)  account to the division annually for all "EX" license plates issued to
it; and
(b)  certify to the division that the information is correct.
(6)  If an entity fails to comply with this section, the division may:
(a)  refuse to renew the registration of its vehicles;
(b)  refuse to issue it additional license plates;
(c)  suspend all its vehicle registrations; and
(d)  recall license plates issued to an entity refusing to comply with this
section.
